Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
Subpart 2 Removal from Permanent Location

8-2-184.
Reversion of manufactured home to personal property; Certificate of Removal from Permanent Location required.

A home which has previously become real property shall become personal property if:

The manufactured home is or is to be removed from the real property with the written consent of the owner of the real property and the holders of all security interests therein; and

The owner of the real property and the holders of all security interests therein execute and file a Certificate of Removal from Permanent Location:

With the commissioner; and

In the real estate records of the county where the real property is located.

The Certificate of Removal from Permanent Location shall be in a form prescribed by the commissioner and shall include:

The name and address of the owner;

The names and addresses of the holders of any security interest and of any lien;

The title number formerly assigned to the home, if applicable;

A description of the real estate on which the home was previously located, including the name of the owner and a reference by deed book and page number to the recording of the former Certificate of Permanent Location; and

Any other data the commissioner prescribes.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-184

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 430, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 3-1/HB 501; Ga. L. 2006, p. 702, § 1/SB 253.

8-2-185.
Responsibilities of commissioner following receipt of Certificate of Removal from Permanent Location.

Upon receipt of a properly executed Certificate of Removal from Permanent Location, the commissioner shall file and retain a copy of such certificate together with all other prior title records related to the home and may thereafter issue a new certificate of title for the home. The commissioner shall charge and collect the fee otherwise prescribed by law for the issuance of a certificate of title.

When a Certificate of Removal from Permanent Location is so filed, the commissioner shall return to the filing party the original of the Certificate of Removal from Permanent Location containing thereon confirmation by the commissioner that the Certificate of Removal from Permanent Location has been so filed.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-185

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 430, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 3-1/HB 501; Ga. L. 2006, p. 702, § 1/SB 253.

8-2-186.
Responsibilities of clerk of superior court upon receipt of Certificate of Removal from Permanent Location.

The clerk of superior court shall not accept a Certificate of Removal from Permanent Location for filing unless the Certificate of Removal from Permanent Location contains thereon the confirmation by the commissioner that the Certificate of Removal from Permanent Location has been filed with the commissioner.

When a Certificate of Removal from Permanent Location is properly filed with the clerk of superior court, the clerk shall record such certificate in the same manner as other instruments affecting the real property described in the Certificate of Removal from Permanent Location and shall charge and collect the fees usually charged for recording deeds and other instruments relating to real estate. Such certificate shall be indexed under the name of the current owner of the real property in both the grantor and grantee indexes.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-186

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 430, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 3-1/HB 501; Ga. L. 2006, p. 702, § 1/SB 253.